Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-817
Petition; hearing; notice; citation; compel attendance of witnesses.

The court shall fix a reasonable time and place for hearing on the petition and shall cause such notice of the filing of the petition and of the time and place of the hearing as it deems necessary to be given to the respondents. The court may, when it deems it necessary, issue a citation to any respondent requiring him to appear at the time and place stated in the citation, and may require the attendance of witnesses as in other civil cases.

Laws 1965, c. 228, § 17, p. 660.